Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-197
Certificates, statements, notations, rules, regulations, and orders under prior law; effect.

(1) The repeal of Chapter 60, article 1, as it existed on September 4, 2005, and the enactment of the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act is not intended to affect the validity of manufacturer's or importer's certificates, certificates of title of any kind, odometer statements, or security interests or liens in existence on such date. All such certificates, statements, and notations are valid under the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act as if issued or made under such act.

(2) The repeal of Chapter 60, article 1, as it existed on September 4, 2005, and the enactment of the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act is not intended to affect the validity of certificates of training for inspections in existence on such date. All such certificates are valid under the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act as if issued under such act.

(3) The rules, regulations, and orders of the Director of Motor Vehicles and the Department of Motor Vehicles issued under Chapter 60, article 1, shall remain in effect as if issued under the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act unless changed or eliminated by the director or the department to the extent such power is statutorily granted to the director and department.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 97.